Massachusetts, session 194th, S1745.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The crime laboratory within the department of state police shall conduct an audit of
offender DNA profiles included on the state DNA databank system in order to identify the
number of DNA profiles missing from the databank which should have been collected pursuant
to section 3 of chapter 22E of the General Laws. The crime laboratory shall support this effort as
necessary to comply with reporting deadlines.
The audit shall initiate with offender DNA samples required to be collected under section
3 of chapter 22E and shall include those offenders who would have been covered under
retroactive provisions of the law that require DNA samples from persons, regardless of
conviction date, as provided by the statute.
of 2

A preliminary report, including the overall number of estimated missing DNA samples
shall be filed with the legislature no later than December 15, 2025 or within 90 days of the
enactment of this section.
A final report shall include additional details, including but not limited to, types of
offenses for which DNA samples are owed and an overview of where collection failures
occurred. The final report shall be submitted no later than December 15, 2026. Thereafter, an
annual audit shall be completed and reported to the clerks of the senate and house of
representatives no later than December 15 of each year.
of 2